test/src/morphology/N-F-С_Д-письмо_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - письмо M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: письмо́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: письмо́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: письма́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: письме́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: письму́
      письмо+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: письмо́м
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: пи́сьма
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: пи́сьма
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: пи́сем
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: пи́сьмах
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: пи́сьмам
      письмо+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: пи́сьмами
